Louisiana, session 2026, HB496.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:4(C)(16)(d) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4. Jurisdiction, duties, and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations
* * *
C. The secretary has authority to make, after notice and hearings as provided
in this Chapter, any reasonable rules, regulations, and orders that are necessary from
time to time in the proper administration and enforcement of this Chapter, including
rules, regulations, or orders for the following purposes:
* * *
(16)
* * *
(d)(i) No rule, regulation, order, or permit issued pursuant to the authority
granted by this Paragraph shall limit the maximum surface injection pressure for
onsite or community saltwater disposal wells in the parishes of Bossier, Caddo, and
Webster to an amount less than the following:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-471 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 496
(aa) One half pound per vertical foot between the surface and the injection
point for any well that is deeper than one thousand two hundred feet and injects less
than three thousand barrels of fluid per day.
(bb) One quarter pound per vertical foot between the surface and the
injection point for any well that is deeper than one thousand two hundred feet and
injects three thousand barrels or more of fluid per day.
(cc) One quarter pound per vertical foot between the surface and the
injection point for any well that is one thousand two hundred feet deep or less.
(ii) Operators with existing permits that limit the maximum surface injection
pressure to an amount less than the minimums provided in this Subparagraph may
submit a request to the department for modification of the permit in compliance with
this Subparagraph.
(iii) The provisions of this Subparagraph shall not apply to commercial
disposal wells.
* * *